src/clock-smn.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ==================== !
! The Inari Sámi clock !
! ==================== !


!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!
!!! NBNB !!! Note !!! At the moment, this is the North Sámi clock !!!



Multichar_Symbols

@U.TIME.1@ 
@U.TIME.2@ 
@U.TIME.3@ 
@U.TIME.4@ 
@U.TIME.5@ 
@U.TIME.6@ 
@U.TIME.7@ 
@U.TIME.8@ 
@U.TIME.9@ 
@U.TIME.10@ 
@U.TIME.11@ 
@U.TIME.12@ 

+Use/NG
+Use/NA


LEXICON Root
     %0: smallhour ;
+Use/NA: smallhour ;
         largehour ;

LEXICON smallhour
  1@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@     AFTpunkt ;    !01:00 - 01:19
  1@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     BEFpunkt ;    !01:20 - 01:59
  2@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     AFTpunkt ;    !02:00 - 02:19
  2@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     BEFpunkt ;    !02:20 - 02:59
  3@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     AFTpunkt ;    !03:00 - 03:19
  3@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     BEFpunkt ;    !03:20 - 03:59
  4@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     AFTpunkt ;    !04:00 - 04:19
  4@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     BEFpunkt ;    !04:20 - 04:59
  5@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     AFTpunkt ;    !05:00 - 05:19
  5@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     BEFpunkt ;    !05:20 - 05:59
  6@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     AFTpunkt ;    !06:00 - 06:19
  6@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     BEFpunkt ;    !06:20 - 06:59
  7@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     AFTpunkt ;    !07:00 - 07:19
  7@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     BEFpunkt ;    !07:20 - 07:59
  8@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     AFTpunkt ;    !08:00 - 08:19
  8@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     BEFpunkt ;    !08:20 - 08:59
  9@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     AFTpunkt ;    !09:00 - 09:19
  9@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   BEFpunkt ;  !09:20 - 09:59

LEXICON largehour
1%0@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   AFTpunkt ;  !10:00 - 10:19
1%0@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@   BEFpunkt ;  !10:20 - 10:59
11@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    AFTpunkt ;   !11:00 - 11:59
11@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    BEFpunkt ;   !11:19 - 11:59
12@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    AFTpunkt ;   !12:00 - 12:19
12@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@      BEFpunkt ;     !12:19 - 12:59
13@U.TIME.1@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.1@      AFTpunkt ;     !13:00 - 13:19
13@U.TIME.2@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.2@      BEFpunkt ;     !13:19 - 13:59
14@U.TIME.2@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.2@      AFTpunkt ;     !14:00 - 114:19
14@U.TIME.3@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.3@      BEFpunkt ;     !14:19 - 14:59
15@U.TIME.3@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.3@      AFTpunkt ;     !15:00 - 15:19
15@U.TIME.4@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.4@      BEFpunkt ;     !15:19 - 15:59
16@U.TIME.4@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.4@      AFTpunkt ;     !16:00 - 16:19
16@U.TIME.5@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.5@      BEFpunkt ;     !16:19 - 16:59
17@U.TIME.5@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.5@      AFTpunkt ;     !17:00 - 17:19
17@U.TIME.6@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.6@      BEFpunkt ;     !17:19 - 17:59
18@U.TIME.6@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.6@      AFTpunkt ;     !18:00 - 18:19
18@U.TIME.7@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.7@      BEFpunkt ;     !18:19 - 18:59
19@U.TIME.7@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.7@      AFTpunkt ;     !19:00 - 19:19
19@U.TIME.8@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.8@      BEFpunkt ;     !19:20 - 19:59
2%0@U.TIME.8@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.8@     AFTpunkt ;    !20:00 - 20:19
2%0@U.TIME.9@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.9@     BEFpunkt ;    !20:20 - 20:59
21@U.TIME.9@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.9@      AFTpunkt ;     !21:00 - 21:19
21@U.TIME.10@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.10@    BEFpunkt ;   !21:20 - 21:59
22@U.TIME.10@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.10@    AFTpunkt ;   !22:00 - 22:19
22@U.TIME.11@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.11@    BEFpunkt ;   !22:19 - 22:59
23@U.TIME.11@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.11@    AFTpunkt ;   !23:00 - 23:19
23@U.TIME.12@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.12@    BEFpunkt ;   !23:19 - 23:59
24%:%0%0+Use/NG:guoktenuppelohkái       # ;      !24:00
%0%0@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@  AFTpunkt ; !00:00 - 00:19
%0%0@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@  BEFpunkt ; !00:19 - 00:59


 LEXICON BEFpunkt
 %:+Use/NA: BEF ;
 %.+Use/NA: BEF ;

LEXICON AFTpunkt
 %:+Use/NA: AFT ;  ! 2:00 = göökte
 %.+Use/NA: AFT ;  ! 2.00 = göökte
 +Use/NA:  HOUR ;  ! 2    = göökte


LEXICON BEF
2%0:logi%               TOHALF ;
 21:ovcci%              TOHALF ;
 22:gávcci%             TOHALF ;
 23:čieža%              TOHALF ;
 24:guhtta%              TOHALF ;
 25:vihtta%             TOHALF ;  
 26:njeallje%           TOHALF ;  
 27:golbma%             TOHALF ;
 28:guokte%             TOHALF ; 
 29:okta%               TOHALF ;
 29+Use/NG:minuhta%     TOHALF ;
 3%0:beal%               HOUR ;
 31:okta%               OVERHALF ;
 31+Use/NG:minuhta%     OVERHALF ;
 32:guokte%              OVERHALF ;
 33:golbma%              OVERHALF ;
 34:njeallje%             OVERHALF ;
 35:vihtta%             OVERHALF ;
 36:guhtta%              OVERHALF ;
 37:čieža%              OVERHALF ;
 38:gávcci%             OVERHALF ; 
 39:ovcci%              OVERHALF ;
 4%0:logi%              OVERHALF ;
 41:ovccinuppelohkái%     TO ;
 42:gávccinuppelohkái%    TO ;
 43:čiežanuppelohkái%     TO ;
 44:guhttanuppelohkái%     TO ;
 45:kvárta%            TO ;
 46:njealljenuppelohkái%  TO ;
 47:golbmanuppelohkái%    TO ;
 48:guoktenuppelohkái%    TO ;
 49:oktanuppelohkái%      TO ;
 5%0:logi%              TO ;
 51:ovcci%              TO ;
 52:gávcci%             TO ;
 53:čieža%              TO ;
 54:guhtta%              TO ;
 55:vihtta%             TO ;  
 56:njeallje%           TO ;  
 57:golbma%             TO ;
 58:guokte%             TO ; 
 59:okta%               TO ;
 59+Use/NG:minuhta%     TO ;

LEXICON AFT
%0%0:                    HOUR ;
 %01:okta%               OVER ;
 %01+Use/NG:minuhta%     OVER ;
 %02:guokte%             OVER ;
 %03:golbma%             OVER ;
 %04:njeallje%           OVER ;
 %05:vihtta%             OVER ;
 %06:guhtta%              OVER ;
 %07:čieža%              OVER ;
 %08:gávcci%             OVER ;
 %09:ovcci%              OVER ;
 1%0:logi%               OVER ;
 11:oktanuppelohkái%       OVER ;
 12:guoktenuppelohkái%     OVER ;
 13:golbmanuppelohkái%     OVER ;
 14:njealljenuppelohkái%   OVER ;
 15:kvárta%                OVER ;
 16:guhttanuppelohkái%      OVER ;
 17:čiežanuppelohkái%      OVER ;
 18:gávccinuppelohkái%     OVER ;
 19:ovccinuppelohkái%      OVER ;

LEXICON TOHALF
 :váile% beal%    HOUR ;

LEXICON OVERHALF
 :badjel% beal%     HOUR ;

LEXICON TO
 :váile%    HOUR ;

LEXICON OVER
 :badjel%   HOUR ;

LEXICON HOUR
NOMHOUR ; !^N^
!LOCHOUR ; !^L^ 

LEXICON NOMHOUR                              
@U.TIME.1@:okta@U.TIME.1@ # ;                
@U.TIME.2@:guokte@U.TIME.2@ # ;              
@U.TIME.3@:golbma@U.TIME.3@ # ;              
@U.TIME.4@:njeallje@U.TIME.4@ # ;            
@U.TIME.5@:vihtta@U.TIME.5@ # ;              
@U.TIME.6@:guhtta@U.TIME.6@ # ;              
@U.TIME.7@:čieža@U.TIME.7@ # ;               
@U.TIME.8@:gávcci@U.TIME.8@ # ;              
@U.TIME.9@:ovcci@U.TIME.9@ # ;               
@U.TIME.10@:logi@U.TIME.10@ # ;              
@U.TIME.11@:oktanuppelohkái@U.TIME.11@ # ;   
@U.TIME.12@:guoktenuppelohkái@U.TIME.12@ # ; 

! Outcommented due to Oahpa. Insert again ad lib.
! LEXICON LOCHOUR                             
! @U.TIME.1@:ovttas@U.TIME.1@ # ;             
! @U.TIME.2@:guovttis@U.TIME.2@ # ;           
! @U.TIME.3@:golmmas@U.TIME.3@ # ;            
! @U.TIME.4@:njealjis@U.TIME.4@ # ;           
! @U.TIME.5@:viđas@U.TIME.5@ # ;              
! @U.TIME.6@:guđas@U.TIME.6@ # ;              
! @U.TIME.7@:čiežas@U.TIME.7@ # ;             
! @U.TIME.8@:gávccis@U.TIME.8@ # ;            
! @U.TIME.9@:ovccis@U.TIME.9@ # ;             
! @U.TIME.10@:logis@U.TIME.10@ # ;            
! @U.TIME.11@:oktanuppelogis@U.TIME.11@ # ;   
! @U.TIME.12@:guoktenuppelogis@U.TIME.12@ # ; 
